Hawaii statutes.
§121-2 Exemptions. The following are
exempt from military duty: all persons exempted from military duty under the
laws of the United States, all judges of the several courts, and the members of
the legislature. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-2]

Revision Note

Reference to
"magistrates" following "judges", deleted as unnecessary in
view of L 1970, c 188.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next